Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 236 Boiler and Pressure Vessel Safety

236.005.
Title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Boiler and Pressure Vessel Safety Act, and, except as otherwise provided herein, shall apply to all boilers and pressure vessels.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 1; 1980, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

236.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Boiler” or “boilers” means and includes a closed vessel in which water or other liquid is heated, steam or vapor is generated, steam is superheated, or in which any combination of these functions is accomplished, under pressure or vacuum, for use externally to itself, by the direct application of energy from the combustion of fuels, or from electricity, solar or nuclear energy. The term “boiler” shall include fired units for heating or vaporizing liquids other than water where these units are separate from processing systems and are complete within themselves:

“Power boiler” means a boiler in which steam or other vapor is generated at a pressure of more than fifteen (15) pounds per square inch gauge;

“High pressure, high temperature water boiler” means a water boiler operating at pressures exceeding one hundred sixty (160) pounds per square inch gauge or temperatures exceeding two hundred fifty (250) degrees Fahrenheit;

“Heating boiler” means a steam or vapor boiler operating at pressures not exceeding fifteen (15) pounds per square inch gauge or a hot water boiler operating at pressures not exceeding one hundred sixty (160) pounds per square inch gauge or temperatures not exceeding two hundred fifty (250) degrees Fahrenheit; and

“Portable boiler” means a boiler which is primarily intended for a temporary location, construction and usage of which allows the boiler to be readily removed from one (1) location to another;

“Pressure vessel” means a vessel in which the pressure is obtained from an external source or by the application of heat other than those vessels defined in subsection (1) of this section;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“Department” means the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction;

“ASME” means American Society of Mechanical Engineers;

“Committee” means the Housing, Buildings and Construction Advisory Committee created by KRS

198B.032

;

“Certificate inspection” means an inspection, the report of which is used by the chief boiler inspector to determine whether or not a certificate, as provided by subsection (1) of KRS

236.120

, may be issued;

“Administrative regulation” means an administrative regulation adopted by the department and filed and approved in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that is designed to ensure the safety of boilers and pressure vessels that affects or may affect property rights of a designated class of owners, or designed for the prevention of loss or damage to property, loss of life, or personal injury from boiler or pressure vessel explosion or from certain indicated hazards related thereto;

“Order” or “emergency order” means an order of the department, chief boiler inspector, or boiler inspector issued in accordance with this chapter for the prevention of:

Loss or damage to property;

Loss of life from boiler or pressure vessel malfunction or explosion; or

Personal injury from boiler or pressure vessel malfunction or explosion;

“Division” means the Division of Plumbing in the department;

“Qualified welder” means a welder or welding machine operator who has successfully passed the tests required by the appropriate ASME boiler, pressure vessel, or piping code;

“Person” or “firm” means any individual, firm, partnership, or corporation;

“Chief boiler inspector” means the person employed by the department who shall serve as the boiler section supervisor within the Division of Plumbing;

“Boiler inspector” means a duly authorized employee of the department who is charged with the responsibility of inspecting boilers and pressure vessels and with the enforcement of the state boiler laws;

“Special boiler inspector” means any person employed by an insurance company authorized to insure boilers and pressure vessels in the Commonwealth and who holds a commission as provided in KRS

236.080

. This term shall apply to both in-service inspectors and authorized inspectors of repairs, alterations, and shop work;

“Domestic water” means potable water delivered by a piping system for personal use or consumption;

“Potable water” means water free from impurities present in amounts sufficient to cause disease or harmful physiological effects and conforming in its bacteriological and chemical quality to the requirements of the Division of Water or the administrative regulations of the department;

“Cryogenic service” means a fluid held under pressure and having a boiling point below one hundred degrees below zero (-100) Fahrenheit at one (1) atmospheric pressure, which upon release results in auto-refrigeration or cooling effect;

“Oil refinery” means a facility used primarily for the refinement of petroleum products;

“Qualified welding procedure” means a welding procedure that has passed tests required by the applicable ASME boiler, pressure vessel, or piping code;

“Boiler external piping” means boiler piping as defined by ASME;

“Non-boiler external piping” means boiler piping and boiler proper connections as defined in ASME Section I and applicable figures, and shall conform to either ASME B31.1 or ASME B31.3, including steam, boiler feedwater, blowdown, vents and drains, and chemical injection piping outside the boiler boundary;

“MAWP” means the maximum allowable working pressure for a boiler, pressure vessel, or piping system;

“Owner facility” means any facility licensed pursuant to KRS 236.097(1);

“Owner’s piping inspector” means any person licensed pursuant to KRS 236.097(2);

“Independent inspection agency” means a person or company licensed under KRS 236.097(3) who is retained by an owner facility to conduct inspections under KRS 236.097(1); and

“Owner-user facility” means any facility that operates pressure vessels and is accredited as an owner-user inspection organization by the national board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 1; 1974, ch. 209, § 1; 1978, ch. 117, § 31, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 207, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 514, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 90, effective June 29, 2017.

236.020.
Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Rules. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 2; 1970, ch. 246, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1978, ch. 117, § 32, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 207, § 3, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 284, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 515, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2017 ch. 169, § 114, effective June 29, 2017.

236.030.
Administrative regulations.

After reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, the commissioner, upon advisement and subject to comment by the committee under the requirements of KRS 198B.030(8) shall, by administrative regulation, fix reasonable standards for the safe construction, installation, inspection, and repair of boilers, pressure vessels, and associated pressure piping in this state. Administrative regulations shall be enforced by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction, Division of Plumbing.

The department may adopt any other administrative regulation necessary to administer this chapter if the regulation has been subject to review and comment by the committee under the requirements of KRS 198B.030(8).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 3; 1970, ch. 246, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1978, ch. 117, § 33, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 207, § 4, effective July 15, 1980; 2006, ch. 256, § 8, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 24, § 516, effective July 15, 2010; 2011, ch. 100, § 19, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 14, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 91, effective June 29, 2017.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

Technical corrections to this section have been made by the Reviser of Statutes under authority of KRS

7.136

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Regulations, requisites of filing, KRS

13A.220

.

236.040.
Conformity required of boilers, pressure vessels, and connecting piping — Inspections.

No boiler or pressure vessel which fails to conform to the rules and regulations formulated by the commissioner governing new construction and installation shall be installed and operated in this state.

Subject to exemptions established in this chapter, all new connecting piping subjected to pressure emanating from a power boiler, heating boiler, hot water supply boiler, or pressure vessel shall be considered part of the boiler or pressure vessel installation, subject to the same boiler or pressure vessel code requirements, and shall be designed in accordance with the rules of ASME piping codes B31.1, B31.3, B31.5, B31.9, or B31.12 or their subsequent revisions, and ASME boiler and pressure vessel code Sections I, III, IV, VIII (Division 1, 2, or 3), or X or subsequent revisions of each. Inspection of such piping shall be performed by an inspector qualified under KRS

236.070

,

236.080

, or

236.097

.

Pressure vessels for human occupancy shall comply with subsection (2) of this section and ASME requirements for pressure vessels for human occupancy. Inspection of such piping shall be performed by a boiler inspector qualified under KRS

236.070

,

236.080

, and

236.097

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 4; 1970, ch. 246, § 3; 1980, ch. 207, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 517, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 4, effective July 12, 2012.

236.050.
Maximum working pressure allowed — Construction of chapter.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a boiler or pressure vessel carrying the ASME code symbol shall be determined by the applicable sections of the code under which it was constructed and stamped.

The maximum allowable working pressure of a boiler or pressure vessel which does not carry the ASME code symbol shall be computed in accordance with the American Petroleum Institute 579/ASME FFS-1 (Fitness for Service) evaluation as adopted by the department and the regulations adopted in accordance with KRS

236.030

.

This chapter shall not be construed as in any way preventing the use or sale of a boiler referred to in this section, provided it has been made to conform to the rules and regulations of the commissioner governing existing installations; and provided, further, it has not been found upon inspection to be in an unsafe condition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 5; 1980, ch. 207, § 6, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 518, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 5, effective July 12, 2012.

236.060.
Application of chapter and KRS 236.005 to 236.150.

This chapter applies to all boilers, pressure vessels, and related piping in the Commonwealth unless statutorily exempted.

KRS

236.005

to

236.150

shall not apply to boilers or pressure vessels or related piping under federal control.

KRS

236.005

to

236.150

shall not apply to the following:

Portable boilers or pressure vessels located on land dedicated to agricultural use, as defined in KRS

100.111

, and used solely for agricultural purposes;

Boilers or pressure vessels located at any oil refineries;

Steam or vapor boilers used for heating purposes carrying a pressure of not more than fifteen (15) pounds per square inch gauge, and which are located in private residences;

Hot water heating boilers carrying a pressure of not more than thirty (30) pounds per square inch gauge or hot water heaters which are located in private residences;

Any pressure vessels used as containers for liquefied petroleum gases and subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction under KRS Chapter 234;

Pressure vessels used for transportation of compressed gases if constructed and operated in compliance with specifications and regulations of another state or federal authority;

Pressure vessels containing air located on vehicles operating under the regulations of another state or federal authority;

Pressure vessels having an internal or external operating pressure of fifteen (15) PSI or less;

Single wall pressure vessels having an inside diameter, width, height, or cross-section diagonal not exceeding six (6) inches;

Any combination unit having an internal or external pressure in each chamber not exceeding fifteen (15) PSI and differential pressure on the common element not exceeding fifteen (15) PSI;

Pressure vessels with a nominal water containing capacity of one hundred twenty (120) gallons or less, to be used for domestic supply purposes, for containing water under pressure, including those containing air, the compression of which serves only as a cushion;

Pressure vessels not exceeding the design pressure at the top of the vessel and with no limitation in size, not exceeding the following:

Vessels having an internal or external pressure of fifteen (15) PSI (100 kilopascals); or

Combination units having an internal or external pressure in each chamber of fifteen (15) PSI (100 kilopascals) and differential pressure on the common elements not exceeding fifteen (15) PSI (100 kilopascals);

Pressure vessels containing water heated by steam or other indirect means when none of the following are exceeded:

Heat input of two hundred thousand (200,000) BTU/Hr.;

Water temperature of two hundred ten (210) degrees Fahrenheit; or

Water storage capacity of one hundred twenty (120) gallons;

Coil type hot water boilers without a steam space and where no steam is generated within the confines of the unit but where water flashes into steam when released to atmospheric pressure by the operation of a manually operated nozzle, unless one (1) of the following is exceeded:

Three quarter (3/4) inch inside diameter tubing or pipe size with no drum or header attached;

Six (6) gallon water containing capacity; or

Three hundred fifty (350) degrees Fahrenheit water temperature;

Water heaters, hot water supply boilers, or hot water storage tanks, which are directly fired with oil, gas, or electricity, when none of the following limitations are exceeded:

Heat input of two hundred thousand (200,000) BTU/Hr.;

A water temperature of two hundred ten (210) degrees Fahrenheit; or

A water containing capacity of one hundred twenty (120) gallons;

Pressure vessels which may be classified as:

Pressure containers which are integral parts of components of rotating or reciprocating mechanical devices such as pumps, compressors, turbines, generators, engines, and hydraulic or pneumatic cylinders where the primary design considerations, stresses, or both are derived from the functional requirements of the device; or

Structures whose primary function is the transport of fluids from one location to another within a system of which it is an integral part, that is, piping system;

Pressure vessels ASME “UM” stamped and which do not exceed the following:

One and one-half (1-1/2) cubic feet in volume and six hundred (600) PSI MAWP;

Three (3) cubic feet in volume and three hundred fifty (350) PSI MAWP; or

Five (5) cubic feet in volume and two hundred fifty (250) PSI MAWP; or

Compressed air receivers of one hundred twenty (120) gallons or less.

This chapter shall apply only to piping associated with boilers and pressure vessels operating in the Commonwealth in the following applications and fluid services:

All boiler external piping, conforming to ASME B31.1;

Non-boiler external piping, including steam, boiler feedwater, blowdown, vents, drains, and chemical injection outside the boiler boundary conforming to ASME B31.1 or B31.3;

All building services piping conforming to ASME B31.9;

All compressed air piping emanating from a pressure vessel conforming to ASME B31.1, B31.3, or B31.9;

All hot oil piping conforming to ASME B31.1 or B31.3; and

All anhydrous ammonia piping conforming to ASME B31.3 or B31.5.

Piping associated with boilers and pressure vessels exempted in subsection (2) of this section shall conform to the appropriate ASME piping code. The owner of the piping shall assume all oversight and responsibilities as established in the appropriate ASME piping code.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 6; 1970, ch. 246, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 24(11); 1978, ch. 117, § 34, effective July 1, 1978; 1980, ch. 207, § 7, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 284, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 89, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 415, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 77, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2010, ch. 24, § 519, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 6, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 59, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

While the legislature exempted boilers under federal control from meeting the standards prescribed in the Boiler Safety Act, federal agencies can voluntarily comply with the act and request an inspection by state officials, provided the inspection fees are paid.

OAG 67-558

.

236.070.
Boiler inspectors.

The department shall employ boiler inspectors who have at the time of appointment not less than five (5) years of practical experience in the construction, maintenance, repair, or operation of high pressure boilers and pressure vessels as a mechanical engineer, practical steam operating engineer, boilermaker, pressure vessel inspector or boiler inspector, and who shall have passed the examination required by KRS

236.090

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 7; 1980, ch. 207, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 520, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 7, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 92, effective June 29, 2017.

236.080.
Special boiler inspectors — State salary prohibited — Duties — Report.

In addition to the boiler inspectors authorized by KRS

236.070

, the department shall, upon the request of any company authorized to insure against loss from explosion of boilers and pressure vessels in this state, issue to any boiler inspectors of said company commissions as special boiler inspectors, provided that each such special boiler inspector before receiving such commission, shall satisfactorily pass the examination provided for in KRS

236.090

, or, in lieu of such examination, shall hold a commission or certificate of competency as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels for a state that has a standard of examination substantially equal to that of this Commonwealth or a commission as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels issued by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

Such special boiler inspectors shall receive no salary from, nor shall any of their expenses be paid by, the state and the continuance of a special inspector’s commission shall be conditioned upon his or her continuing in the employ of an insurance company duly authorized as aforesaid and upon his or her maintenance of the standards imposed by this chapter.

Such special boiler inspectors shall inspect all boilers and pressure vessels insured by their respective companies, and, when so inspected and reported as required, the owners and users of such insured boilers and pressure vessels shall be exempt from the payment to the state of the inspection fees as provided for in KRS

236.120

and

236.130

.

Each company employing such special boiler inspectors shall within thirty (30) days following each certificate inspection made by such inspectors, file a report of such inspection with the division upon appropriate forms prescribed by the division. Other than the certificate inspection report, no reporting of other inspections shall be required except when such inspections disclose that the boiler or pressure vessel is in a dangerous condition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 8; 1980, ch. 207, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 521, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 8, effective July 12, 2012.

236.090.
Examination.

Examination for a certificate of competency or a national board commission for boiler inspectors or special boiler inspectors shall be in writing and shall be given and monitored by the boiler inspection section of the division. Examinations are given on the first Wednesday and Thursday of the months of March, June, September and December of each year. The record of an applicant’s examination shall be accessible to said applicant and his employer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 9; 1980, ch. 207, § 10, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 522, effective July 15, 2010.

236.095.
Owner-user inspectors — Issuance of commission — Requirements — Reports — State salary prohibited.

In addition to boiler inspectors authorized by KRS

236.070

, the department shall issue an owner-user inspector commission to any inspector commissioned by a company operating a pressure vessel within the Commonwealth if:

The company has an established and regular inspection program;

The company is listed as an accredited Owner-User Inspection Organization in compliance with the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors Accreditation of Owner-User Inspection Organizations;

The inspection program, personnel, equipment, and supervision meet the requirements established by the department; and

The owner-user inspector applicant has successfully passed the examination required by KRS

236.090

; or

The owner-user inspector applicant holds a commission as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels issued by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

A commission as an owner-user inspector shall be issued only if, in addition to meeting the requirements of this section, the inspector is continuously employed by the company for the purpose of making inspections of pressure vessels used or to be used by the company, not of pressure vessels to be resold.

A licensed owner-user inspector may not inspect boilers within the Commonwealth.

A licensed owner-user inspector may inspect only pressure vessels insured by the inspector’s employing company. When the vessels are inspected and reported as required, the owners and users of insured pressure vessels shall be exempt from payment to the state of inspection fees as provided in KRS

236.130

.

Each company employing a licensed owner-user inspector shall, within thirty (30) days following each certificate of inspection, file a report of inspection with the department. Reports shall be submitted upon forms prescribed by the department.

No reporting of inspections other than the certificate of inspection reports shall be required unless an inspection reveals that the pressure vessel is in a dangerous condition.

A licensed owner-user inspector shall receive no salary from, nor shall any expenses be paid by, the Commonwealth.

Continuance of an owner-user inspector’s commission shall be conditioned upon the inspector continuing employment for an owner-user company meeting requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 14, § 9, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 93, effective June 29, 2017.

236.097.
Owner facility license — Owner’s piping inspector license — Independent inspection agency license — Application of licensing requirements.

An owner facility subject to piping inspection by the department under this chapter may apply for a license from the department to allow the facility to conduct its own site piping inspections, other than for boiler external piping, in lieu of an inspection by the department.

No piping inspections shall be conducted under an owner facility license unless the owner’s piping inspector is licensed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, or the contracted independent inspection agency is licensed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The department shall be notified of the owner facility’s retention of the owner’s piping inspector or independent inspection agency.

The department shall develop and make available on the department’s Web site an application for a license described in this subsection.

The application shall require the owner facility to:

List all owner’s piping inspectors retained by the facility;

List all independent inspection agencies retained by the facility; and

Provide evidence that the facility has employees who hold, or retains a contractor who holds, a license issued under KRS

236.210

for the facility and the facility has general liability insurance through a company permitted to transact insurance in Kentucky.

The list of owner’s piping inspectors and independent inspection agencies shall be updated and provided to the department within thirty (30) days of a change.

The department shall issue or deny a license under this subsection within forty-five (45) days of receiving a complete application.

With the application, the applicant shall submit a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000). If the application is denied by the department, the department shall refund five hundred dollars ($500) of the application fee to the applicant.

An owner facility license shall be issued for a period of two (2) years.

To renew a license the applicant shall submit a completed renewal application no later than sixty (60) days prior to license expiration with a nonrefundable renewal fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

Prior to renewal, the department shall conduct an audit of piping at owner-licensed facilities. The audit shall verify that the piping conforms to standards prescribed by the ASME adopted by the department. An owner facility license shall continue in effect until approved or denied by the department so long as a renewal application is submitted as required by paragraph (f) of this subsection.

Each licensed owner facility shall maintain records of all piping inspections, including identification of the owner’s piping inspector or independent inspection agency, for a period of five (5) years following the inspection. Records of inspections shall be made available to the department upon request.

An owner’s piping inspector shall be licensed by the department prior to conducting piping inspections, other than for boiler external piping.

The department shall develop and make available on the department’s Web site an application for an owner’s piping inspector license.

The department shall issue or deny a license under this subsection upon review of a completed application demonstrating that the applicant meets the following criteria:

For inspections of piping repairs, the applicant is certified as defined under American Petroleum Institute Standard 570, Piping Inspection Code: Inspection, Repair, Alteration, and Rerating of In-Service Piping Systems; or

For all other inspections of piping, the applicant qualifies under owner inspection requirements pursuant to ASME piping code B31.1 or B31.3, as applicable, or the applicant holds a commission from the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors.

With the application, the applicant shall submit an initial nonrefundable license application fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for a two (2) year license.

The initial license fee may be prorated for not less than thirteen (13) months or more than thirty-six (36) months.

An initial owner’s piping inspector license shall expire on the final day of the applicant’s birth month in the second year following the issue date.

To renew a license, the applicant shall submit a completed renewal application and a nonrefundable renewal fee of fifty dollars ($50) to the department.

Any independent inspection agency that employs licensed owner’s piping inspectors shall be licensed by the department as an independent inspection agency.

The department shall develop and make available on the department’s Web site an independent inspection agency license application.

With the application, the applicant shall submit a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and a list of all owner’s piping inspectors employed by the independent inspection agency. If the application is denied, five hundred dollars ($500) shall be refunded to the applicant.

The list of owner’s piping inspectors employed by the independent inspection agency shall be updated and provided to the department within thirty (30) days of change.

An independent inspection agency license shall be effective for a period of two (2) years following the date of issuance.

To renew a license, the applicant shall submit a completed renewal application and a nonrefundable renewal fee of five hundred dollars ($500).

Each licensed independent inspection agency shall maintain a record of all piping inspections for a period of five (5) years following the inspection, including identification of the owner’s piping inspectors. Records of inspections shall be made available to the department upon request.

The licensing requirements of this section shall only apply to piping otherwise required to be inspected by a boiler inspector employed by the department pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 14, § 10, effective July 12, 2012.

236.100.
Suspension or revocation of appointment or commission — Notice and hearing — Reinstatement — Penalty for falsification of application or inspection report.

Any boiler inspector’s, special inspector’s, owner-user inspector’s, or owner’s piping inspector’s appointment or commission may be suspended or revoked by the department, after due investigation and hearing thereon, for the incompetence or untrustworthiness of the holder thereof, or for willful falsification of any matter or statement contained in his or her application or in a report of any inspection made by him or her. Written notice of and an opportunity for a hearing on any suspension or revocation under this subsection shall be given by the department to the inspector, and in the case of a special boiler inspector, also to his or her employer in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B.

A person whose appointment or commission has been suspended shall be entitled to apply to the commissioner, after ninety (90) days from the date of the suspension, for reinstatement of the appointment or commission.

Any willful falsification of an application or inspection report shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall subject the inspector or special inspector to the penalties provided in KRS

236.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 10; 1980, ch. 207, § 11, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 154, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 523, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 11, effective July 12, 2012.

236.110.
Inspection of boilers and pressure vessels required — Certificate of inspection — Periods of inspection — Penalty for falsifying certificate of inspection.

Each boiler or pressure vessel used or proposed to be used within this state, except boilers or pressure vessels exempt under KRS

236.060

, shall be thoroughly inspected as to their construction, installation, and condition as follows:

Power boilers shall receive a certificate of inspection annually which shall be an internal inspection where construction permits; otherwise it shall be as complete an inspection as possible. Such boilers shall also be externally inspected while under pressure if possible;

Low pressure steam or vapor heating boilers, hot water heating boilers, and hot water supply boilers shall receive a certificate of inspection biennially; said inspection shall include internal inspection where construction permits. External inspections shall be required where construction does not permit internal inspection;

Pressure vessels shall be inspected at time of installation to ascertain that they are in conformance with KRS

236.040

. Subsequent reinspections, if any, shall be set by administrative regulation of the department;

A grace period of two (2) months beyond the periods specified in paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of this subsection may elapse between inspections;

The department may at its discretion permit longer periods between inspections;

All new boiler or pressure vessel installations to be used within this state, excepting boilers or pressure vessels exempted under KRS

236.060

, shall be inspected during the installation period to ascertain that all pressure piping conforms to the requirements of KRS

236.040

. A certificate of inspection may not be issued on any new installation until these requirements are fulfilled;

It shall be the responsibility of the installing contractor to request the above inspection by notifying the boiler inspection section that the installation is ready for inspection. Notification shall be accomplished prior to covering of any welded or mechanical joints on pressure piping or valves by insulation, paint, or structural materials. The contractor shall provide ready access for the inspector to all parts of the piping system;

Inspection of pressure piping shall apply only to new boiler, pressure vessel, or new pressure piping system installations, or reinstallations, or installation of secondhand boilers (as defined under “Boiler Rules and Regulations”). No annual or biennial reinspection shall be required once the system has been approved;

“Existing installations,” as applied to inspection of piping systems is defined as any boiler and piping system completed and approved for operation prior to July 1, 1970, or pressure vessels and associated piping systems completed and approved for operation prior to July 15, 1980. These existing installations shall not be subject to the foregoing piping inspection unless adjudged patently unsafe for operation by a boiler inspector holding a commission issued by the National Board of Boiler and Pressure Vessel Inspectors, or by an owner’s piping inspector, when authorized. If an existing installation is so adjudged, the owner or user shall be granted full rights of appeal as set forth under KRS

236.150

;

If an existing installation undergoes extensive overhaul or more than fifty (50) linear feet of pressure piping requires renewal or is added to the existing system, the entire system of piping carrying pressure emanating from the boilers shall be subject to inspection and shall be brought up to standards required by KRS 236.040;

The installing contractor of a piping system carrying pressure emanating from a boiler or pressure vessel subject to inspection under provisions of this chapter, shall pay to the department, upon completion of inspection, fees in accordance with a schedule established by the department;

Operation of a pressure piping system in conjunction with a boiler or pressure vessel, either of which has not been inspected and approved as set forth above, shall be subject to fines and penalties as set forth in KRS

236.990

; and

For any boiler or pressure vessel used by a utility to generate power, and operating under a certificate issued pursuant to KRS

278.020

, if the boiler or pressure vessel is inspected by a special boiler inspector pursuant to this section, the inspection interval shall be extended to eighteen (18) months.

The inspections required in this section shall be made by a boiler inspector or by a special boiler inspector, except that all new installations shall be inspected by a boiler inspector employed by the department. However, an owner’s piping inspector may inspect new, repaired, and replaced ASME standard process piping.

If at any time a hydrostatic, pneumatic, or any other nondestructive test shall be deemed necessary for ascertaining acceptability of a boiler, pressure vessel, or associated piping, the same shall be made by the contractor or owner-user, whoever is responsible for the condition, and be witnessed by a boiler inspector, special boiler inspector, or owner’s piping inspector in authorized locations.

All boilers to be installed in this state after July 1, 1970, and all pressure vessels installed in this state after July 15, 1980, shall be inspected during construction as required by the applicable rules and regulations of the department by a boiler inspector authorized to inspect boilers and pressure vessels in this state, or, if constructed outside of the state, by an inspector holding a commission from the national board as an inspector of boilers and pressure vessels.

No person shall willfully falsify any statement designed to secure the issuance, renewal or reinstatement of a certificate of inspection. Violation of this subsection shall subject such a person to the penalties stated in KRS

236.990

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 89, § 11; 1970, ch. 246, § 5; 1978, ch. 384, § 98, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 207, § 12, effective July 15, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 524, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 14, § 12, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 169, § 94, effective June 29, 2017.